Utah statutes.
78B-6-1211.   Notice of appearance before referee -- Referee's report.
(1)  The referee appointed in Section 78B-6-1210 shall set a date to hear from
each person holding a lien on the property.  The plaintiff shall have a notice
and summons served on each person identified in Section 78B-6-1210 who is not
a party to the action.
(2)  The summons shall state the specific time and place of the hearing and
instruct the person to appear with proof of all amounts due.
(3)  If the person cannot be found, the court may direct service to be made by
publication in accordance with the Utah Rules of Civil Procedure.
(4)  The referee shall provide a report to the court detailing his findings.
The court shall confirm, modify, or set aside the findings.  If the findings
are set aside, a new referee may be appointed in accordance with Section
78B-6-1210.
